Illinois, session 104th, HB469.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Retention of Illinois Students and Equity 5Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 986/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Retention of Illinois Students and Equity Act.9(Source: P.A. 101-21, eff. 1-1-20.)